Louisiana, session 2026, HB322.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.12.1(F) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
15:574.12.1(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.12.1. Testimony provided in executive session before the Board of Pardons
and committee on parole; confidentiality
* * *
F. No fees or costs provided by law shall be assessed against a victim,
spouse or next of kin of a deceased victim, or legal guardian of a victim who requests
a copy of the testimony pursuant to this Section.
G. Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections or law enforcement from sharing information as authorized or required
by state or federal law.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 322 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.